Utah statutes.
58-76-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings.
Division grounds for refusal to issue a license to an applicant, for refusal
to renew the license of a licensee, to revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on
probation the license of a licensee, to issue a public or private reprimand to
a licensee, and to issue cease and desist orders are in accordance with
Section 58-1-401.
